Massachusetts, session 194th, H3825.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Part 1 – Title I – Chapter 2 – Section 6a is hereby amended by inserting the following as 
paragraph (h): “On the death of an actively serving service member from the U.S. Army, U.S. 
Air Force, U.S. Navy, U.S. Marine Corp, U.S. Space Force, U.S. Coast Guard, the Reserve 
Component, or the National Guard from the Commonwealth.